Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 2. Admission Requirements and Preferences

History.

2021 ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2021, ch. 47, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

§ 21-24-201.
Extension of residential requirement for admission.

For admission into an academic program or a course of study, if the University of Wyoming or any Wyoming community college, vocational, technical or trade school, other secondary educational institution or school district gives a preference or benefit to Wyoming residents, the same preference or benefit shall be extended to any current Wyoming national guard member regardless of the member’s state of residence. This section applies when Wyoming residency is required for selection by or entry into a program. This section does not apply for calculating tuition or fees.

History.

2021 ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 47, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.